Florida, session 2026, SB940.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 180.191, Florida 21 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (5) is added to that 22 section, to read: 23 180.191âLimitation on rates charged consumer outside city 24 limits.â 25 (1)âAny municipality within this the state which operates 26 operating a water or sewer utility outside of the boundaries of 27 the such municipality shall charge consumers outside the 28 boundaries rates, fees, and charges determined in one of the 29 following manners: 30 (a)âIt may charge the same rates, fees, and charges as 31 consumers inside the municipal boundaries. However, in addition 32 thereto, the municipality may add a surcharge of not more than 33 25 percent of such rates, fees, and charges to consumers outside 34 the boundaries. Fixing of such rates, fees, and charges in this 35 manner shall not require a public hearing except as may be 36 provided for service to consumers inside the municipality. 37 (b)âIt may charge rates, fees, and charges that are just 38 and equitable and that which are based on the same factors used 39 in fixing the rates, fees, and charges for consumers inside the 40 municipal boundaries. The In addition thereto, the municipality 41 may add a surcharge not to exceed 25 percent of such rates, 42 fees, and charges for said services to consumers outside the 43 boundaries. However, the total of all such rates, fees, and 44 charges for the services to consumers outside the boundaries 45 shall not be more than 50 percent in excess of the total amount 46 the municipality charges consumers served within the 47 municipality for corresponding service. No Such rates, fees, and 48 charges may not shall be fixed until after a public hearing at 49 which all of the users of the water or sewer systems; owners, 50 tenants, or occupants of property served or to be served 51 thereby; and all others interested shall have had an opportunity 52 to be heard concerning the proposed rates, fees, and charges. 53 Any change or revision of the such rates, fees, or charges may 54 be made in the same manner as the such rates, fees, or charges 55 were originally established, but if a such change or revision is 56 to be made substantially pro rata as to all classes of service, 57 both inside and outside the municipality, a no hearing or notice 58 is not shall be required. 59 60 Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b), a municipality may 61 continue to impose a surcharge on consumers outside the 62 municipal boundaries only to the extent necessary to comply with 63 the terms of bond covenants in effect as of July 1, 2024. Such 64 surcharges must be phased out upon retirement, expiration, or 65 refinancing of the applicable debt obligation. 66 (5)(a)âBy January 1, 2028, and every 7 years thereafter, 67 each municipality subject to subsection (1) shall submit a rate 68 study to the Department of Environmental Protection which, at a 69 minimum, evaluates all of the following: 70 1.âThe utilityâs future capital investment needs. 71 2.âWhether the utilityâs rates are expected to generate 72 sufficient revenues to cover its operating and maintenance 73 costs, to satisfy its existing debt service obligations, and to 74 support current and planned capital investments. 75 3.âWhether costs are equitably distributed among all 76 customer classes. 77 (b)âA municipality serving fewer than 10,000 water or sewer 78 customers may petition the department for an extension of up to 79 2 years to complete the required rate study. The department may 80 grant such extension upon a showing of undue financial or 81 administrative burden. 82 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.